Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-913
Implements for escape; other contraband; penalty.

(1) A person commits an offense if he unlawfully introduces within a detention facility, or unlawfully provides an inmate with, any weapon, tool, or other thing which may be useful for escape. An inmate commits an offense if he unlawfully procures, makes, or otherwise provides himself with, or has in his possession, any such implement of escape. Unlawfully means surreptitiously or contrary to law, regulation, or order of the detaining authority.

(2) Introducing escape implements is a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 198.

The crime of escape may, but does not necessarily, include the use of force. State v. White, 209 Neb. 218, 306 N.W.2d 906 (1981).